trunk/incubator/apertium-fo-is.is.dix
    <pardef n="fr/ammi__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ammi</l>
          <r>ammi<s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amar</l>
          <r>ammi<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emst</l>
          <r>ammi<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="l/ágt__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ágt</l>
          <r>ágt<s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ægra</l>
          <r>ágt<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ægst</l>
          <r>ágt<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="leng/i__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ur</l>
          <r>i<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>st</l>
          <r>i<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="d/júpt__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>júpt</l>
          <r>júpt<s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ýpra</l>
          <r>júpt<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ýpst</l>
          <r>júpt<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/varla__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>varla</l>
          <r>varla<s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>síður</l>
          <r>varla<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>síst</l>
          <r>varla<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="lík/t__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>t<s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ast</l>
          <r>t<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="skýr/t__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>t<s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>t<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ast</l>
          <r>t<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ná/ið__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ið</l>
          <r>ið<s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nar</l>
          <r>ið<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nast</l>
          <r>ið<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="víða__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>st</l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="síða/r__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r>r<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>st</l>
          <r>r<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="létt__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ast</l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="upp__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="takk__ij">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="ij"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


  </pardefs>

    <e lm="takk"><i>takk</i><par n="takk__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="sko"><i>sko</i><par n="takk__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="já"><i>já</i><par n="takk__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="vá"><i>vá</i><par n="takk__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="takk fyrir"><i>takk<b/>fyrir</i><par n="takk__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="nei"><i>nei</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="jú"><i>jú</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="já"><i>já</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="algerlega"><i>algerlega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="rúmlega"><i>rúmlega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="algjörlega"><i>algjörlega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="auðveldlega"><i>auðveldlega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="eflaust"><i>eflaust</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="einfaldlega"><i>einfaldlega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="endilega"><i>endilega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="fljótlega"><i>fljótlega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="iðulega"><i>iðulega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="jafnvel"><i>jafnvel</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nákvæmlega"><i>nákvæmlega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nefnilega"><i>nefnilega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="opinberlega"><i>opinberlega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tæplega"><i>tæplega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tiltölulega"><i>tiltölulega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="vissulega"><i>vissulega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="afskaplega"><i>afskaplega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="snögglega"><i>snögglega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="svolítið"><i>svolítið</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="rétt"><i>rétt</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="einstaklega"><i>einstaklega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="þaðan"><i>þaðan</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="neðan"><i>neðan</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="bara"><i>bara</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="aðallega"><i>aðallega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="næsta"><i>næsta</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="áfram"><i>áfram</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="auðvitað"><i>auðvitað</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ennþá"><i>ennþá</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="fyrr"><i>fyrr</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="gjarnan"><i>gjarnan</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="heima"><i>heima</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hvar"><i>hvar</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hve"><i>hve</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hvenær"><i>hvenær</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hversu"><i>hversu</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="kannski"><i>kannski</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="langt"><i>langt</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="meir"><i>meir</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="meira"><i>meira</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="oft"><i>oft</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="sérstaklega"><i>sérstaklega</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="snemma"><i>snemma</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="uppi"><i>uppi</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="úti"><i>úti</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="þangað"><i>þangað</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="þarna"><i>þarna</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="betur"><i>betur</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="stundum"><i>stundum</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="aldrei"><i>aldrei</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="meira"><i>meira</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="aðeins"><i>aðeins</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="alveg"><i>alveg</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="líka"><i>líka</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="alltaf"><i>alltaf</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hér"><i>hér</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="niður"><i>niður</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="upp"><i>upp</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="núna"><i>núna</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="bráðum"><i>bráðum</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="oft"><i>oft</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="strax"><i>strax</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="út"><i>út</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="inn"><i>inn</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="innan"><i>innan</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="utan"><i>utan</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="þar"><i>þar</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ekki"><i>ekki</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="þegar"><i>þegar</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="svo"><i>svo</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="einnig"><i>einnig</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="fram"><i>fram</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="mjög"><i>mjög</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="aftur"><i>aftur</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hægt"><i>hægt</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nú"><i>nú</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="áður"><i>áður</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="saman"><i>saman</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="gikið"><i>mikið</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="örlítið"><i>örlítið</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="neikvætt"><i>neikvætt</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="svolítið"><i>svolítið</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ekki lengur"><i>ekki<b/>lengur</i><par n="upp__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="lengi"><i>leng</i><par n="leng/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="náið"><i>ná</i><par n="ná/ið__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="varla"><i/><par n="/varla__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="skýrt"><i>skýr</i><par n="skýr/t__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="sterkt"><i>sterk</i><par n="skýr/t__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="djúpt"><i>d</i><par n="d/júpt__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="frammi"><i>fr</i><par n="fr/ammi__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="lágt"><i>l</i><par n="l/ágt__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="létt"><i>létt</i><par n="létt__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="víða"><i>víða</i><par n="víða__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="síðar"><i>síða</i><par n="síða/r__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="frekar"><i>freka</i><par n="síða/r__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="líkt"><i>lík</i><par n="lík/t__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="víst"><i>vís</i><par n="lík/t__adv"/></e>
